California statutes. Elections Code
(2) This number shall be divided by one-thirtieth of the number of votes cast in San Bernardino County for Governor or, where the party did not have a candidate for Governor, for the candidate mentioned above. The integer next larger than the quotient obtained by that division shall constitute the number of members of the committee to be elected by that party in that supervisor district.

(b) The San Bernardino County Central Committee shall be composed of not fewer than 30 members. If the procedure outlined above would result in fewer than 30 members being elected to the committee, the number of votes cast for this party’s candidate in each supervisor district shall be divided by an amount
 sufficiently smaller than one-thirtieth of the votes cast for Governor in San Bernardino County as to give a membership on the committee equal to or the nearest amount that is greater than 30 members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 65, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7401.

In each county containing more than four and less than 20 Assembly districts, a county central committee shall be elected from Assembly districts and shall consist of six members elected from each Assembly district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7402.

In each county containing 20 or more Assembly districts a county central committee shall consist of seven members elected from each Assembly district contained either wholly or partially within the county. In an Assembly district that lies only partially within a county containing 20 or more Assembly districts, the seven members shall be elected from that portion of the Assembly district contained within the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.

(a) In the City and County of San Francisco, the county central committee shall be elected from the two Assembly districts located in the city and county and shall consist of 25 members. Whichever of the two Assembly districts consists of the majority of the registered Republicans in the city and county shall elect 13 members plus one additional member for every 4 percent of the registered Republicans in the district above a majority of the registered Republicans in the city and county. The remainder of the members shall be elected from the Assembly district that consists of the minority of the registered Republicans in the city and county.

(b) Both of the following shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Registered Republican” means any voter in the city and county who has expressed a preference for the Republican Party on his or her affidavit of registration pursuant to Sections 2150, 2151, and 2152 as of the 154th day prior to the first direct primary election after any redistricting of Assembly district boundaries.

(2) The City and County of San Francisco Department of Elections, or any comparable successor agency, shall calculate the percentage of the total registered Republicans in each Assembly district in the city and county.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the June 5, 2012, statewide primary election, signers of nomination papers for candidates for the county central committee shall be voters who disclosed
 a preference, pursuant to Section 2151, for the Republican Party and who are residents in the County of San Francisco, regardless of whether they are residents of the district in which the candidate is to be voted on.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 8, Sec. 6.   (AB 1200)   Effective March 8, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7404.

(a) In each county, the nominee of the party for State Senator, the nominees of the party for the Assembly, and any person nominated to either the Senate or Assembly at a special election to fill a vacancy in the house, and the nominee of the party for Representative in Congress shall be ex officio members of this committee. If the person most recently nominated or elected from one party at the special election for an Assembly or Senate seat, or for the House of Representatives shall be other than the nominee of that party for the same office at the earlier election, the ex officio membership of the latter nominee shall expire immediately upon certification by the Secretary of State of the nomination or, if there is
 no runoff, the election of the person most recently nominated or elected. Ex officio members shall be entitled to all the rights and privileges, including the right to vote, and shall have the same standing in every way as other members of this committee, except they shall not be entitled to a ballot designation of incumbent upon seeking election to this committee in the next presidential primary. A person shall be entitled to ex officio membership upon receiving a certificate of nomination from the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 8147, at which time the term of the former nominee shall expire.

(b) If the person most recently nominated to the Senate, Assembly, or House of Representatives received fewer votes for the particular office at the ensuing general election than a write-in candidate for the same office, and the write-in
 candidate is elected to that office, the write-in candidate shall, for purposes of this part, be considered the ex officio member of each affected county, provided that the write-in candidate’s affidavit of registration reflects that that candidate has been affiliated with the party for at least six months prior to the general election.

(c) If a write-in candidate is entitled to ex officio membership on each affected county central committee pursuant to subdivision (b), each affected county central committee shall designate the party nominee described in subdivision (b) as an additional ex officio member to its committee. Any person designated as an ex officio member under this subdivision shall be entitled to all the rights and privileges as other ex officio members of the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 7.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7405.

The nominee for each of the following offices shall be an ex officio member of the committee in the county in which he or she resides:

(a) Governor.

(b) Lieutenant Governor.

(c) Treasurer.

(d) Controller.

(e) Attorney General.

(f) Secretary of State.

(g) Member of the State Board of Equalization.

(h) United States Senator from California. His or her rights and privileges, including the right to membership, shall be the same as those prescribed for other ex officio members in Section 7404.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7406.

A committee may authorize each elected member and each ex officio member of that committee to appoint an alternate member. An ex officio member who is also an incumbent officeholder of any of the offices listed in Sections 7404 and 7405 at the time of the meeting of the committee may appoint an alternate member without authorization from that committee, if the member desires to appoint an alternate.

The alternate member shall have the right to vote only with the written authorization of the member who appointed him or
 her. An alternate member of a committee shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the committee.

An alternate member must meet the same qualifications as the regular member, and may vote only in the absence of the member who appointed him or her, except that an alternate member appointed by an incumbent Senator, Member of the Assembly, or Representative in Congress need not reside in the district of the appointing power but need only reside in the county of jurisdiction of the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7407.

A person shall not be eligible for appointment or election to a committee who is not registered as affiliated with this party at the time of his or her appointment or election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7409.

In the event that the candidates elected to a committee from a district do not equal the number of party committeemembers to which that district is entitled to be represented, a vacancy or vacancies exist to the extent of the difference between the number of elected committeemembers and the number of committeemembers by which the district is entitled to be represented. When a vacancy or vacancies exist they shall be filled by the committee to which insufficient members were elected, in the manner provided for in Section 7410.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7410.

In the event of the appointment or election to a committee of an ineligible person, or whenever any member of the committee dies, resigns or becomes incapacitated to act, or removes from the jurisdiction of the committee, or ceases to be a member of this party, a vacancy exists which shall be filled by appointment by the committee in which the ineligibility or vacancy occurs. A vacancy shall also exist on a committee when a member is removed from the committee pursuant to Section 7411 or 7413.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7411.

(a) Any member of a committee, other than an ex officio member, who misses four regularly called meetings within one 12-month period shall be removed from the committee concerned, unless his or her absence is caused by illness or temporary absence from the county on the date of the meeting.

(b) A committee may, in its sole discretion and in accordance with its bylaws, remove a member who misses four or more regularly called meetings within one 12-month period, regardless of
 the reasons for the absences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 257, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7412.

The removal of residence by an elected or appointed member of a committee from the Assembly district or supervisor district from which he or she has been elected or appointed a member of that committee shall constitute his or her automatic resignation from the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7413.

A committee may remove any member, other than an ex officio member, who during his or her term of membership affiliates with, or registers as a member of another party, who publicly advocates that the voters should not vote for the nominee of this party for any office, or who gives support or avows a preference for a candidate of another party or candidate who is opposed to a candidate nominated by this party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7414.

Whenever any person is appointed to fill a vacancy on a committee, the chairperson of the committee shall file notices of the appointment with the elections official and the chairperson of the state central committee within 30 days after it is made. The notices shall contain the name and address of the person appointed and the name of the person replaced, and shall indicate the date of the appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election [7420. - 7425.]

7420.

(a) At every presidential primary election, a member may be elected to a county central committee to replace a member whose term is expiring.

(b) When district boundaries are redrawn and districts are renumbered in accordance with the decennial census, a member of a county central committee may run for election in a newly
 numbered district at the next election even though his or her current term of office has not expired. If a person is elected in the newly numbered district and takes the oath of office, the person is deemed to have resigned from his or her previous district office at that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 8.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7421.

The elections official, no later than January 31 preceding the presidential primary, shall compute the number of members of the committee allotted to each Assembly district or supervisor district, as the case may be, pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 9.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7422.

In each county the name of each candidate for member of a committee shall appear upon the ballot only upon the filing of a nomination paper pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8020) to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8100), inclusive, of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 8, signed on his or her behalf by the voters of the Assembly or supervisorial district in which he or she is a candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 811, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7423.

If the elections official, on the 73rd day prior to the presidential primary election, finds that the number of candidates nominated for election to a committee from an Assembly or supervisorial district does not exceed the number of candidates to be elected from that Assembly or supervisorial district, the designation of the office and the names of the candidates shall not be printed on this party’s ballot in the Assembly or supervisorial district. In lieu thereof, the board of supervisors shall declare elected the candidates who have been nominated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 10.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7424.

Whenever a candidate for election to a committee dies on or before the day of election, and a sufficient number of ballots are marked as being voted for him or her to entitle him or her to election if he or she had lived until after the election, a vacancy exists on the county central committee, which shall be filled by the committee in the same manner as other vacancies are filled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7425.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county central committee, in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the committee, may determine the number, the district allocation, and the manner of election of its members at any time by holding a caucus or convention, or by using any other method approved by the committee.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a county central committee to remove an ex officio member of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 11.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings [7430. - 7431.]

7430.

The Department of General Services shall permit any committee that desires to do so to hold meetings in a state building within the county, at least one of which meetings each month shall be without charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7431.

All meetings of the committee shall be held in quarters that shall be accessible to persons with disabilities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Business [7440. - 7444.]

7440.

A committee shall have charge of the party campaign under general direction of the state central committee or of the executive committee selected by the state central committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7441.

At the first meeting, a committee shall organize by selecting a chairperson, a secretary, and any other officers and committees as it deems necessary for carrying on the affairs of this party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   (AB 334)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7442.

A committee may make rules and regulations providing for any of the following:

(a) How officers of the committee may be removed.

(b) How meetings may be called, and any provisions so made shall supersede anything in this chapter to the contrary.

(c) Whether or not proxies may be used and the conditions under which they may be used.

Any rule adopted prior to statutory authorization by any county central committee by majority vote of the members elected to the committee is hereby validated and made of the same effect as if subsequently adopted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7443.

The committees shall perform any other duties and services for this political party as seem to be for the benefit of the party. Members of a county central committee may serve after the expiration date of their terms until the election, or the selection pursuant to Section 7425, and qualification of the new members replacing them on the county central committees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 12.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7444.

If the chairperson of a committee refuses to call a meeting, a meeting may be called upon five days’ notice by a majority of the members of the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 8, Sec. 8.   (AB 1200)   Effective March 8, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. District Committees [7460. - 7470.]

7460.

This article applies only to committees established by Assembly districts or supervisorial districts within a county pursuant to the bylaws of the county central committee of that county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7461.

The committees shall be called county Assembly district committees or county supervisorial district committees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7462.

Each committee shall consist of the persons elected to the county central committee of a single Assembly or supervisorial district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7463.

The district committees of a county and the ex officio members of the county central committee constitute the county central committee of that county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7464.

The district committees may elect any officers and undertake any action as the bylaws of the county central committee of which they are a part provide.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7465.

In the event that the candidates elected to a district committee do not equal the number of party committeemembers by which the district is entitled to be represented under Article 1 (commencing with Section 7400), a vacancy or vacancies exist to the extent of the difference between the number of elected committeemembers and the number of committeemembers by which the district is entitled to be represented. When a vacancy or vacancies exist, they shall be filled by the district committee to which insufficient members were elected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7466.

In the event of the appointment or election to a district committee of an ineligible person, or whenever any member of the committee dies, resigns or becomes incapacitated to act, is removed from office, or removes from the jurisdiction of the district committee, or ceases to be a member of this party, a vacancy exists which shall be filled by appointment by the district committee in which the ineligibility or vacancy occurs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7467.

Any member of a district committee who misses more than three consecutive regularly called meetings of the county central committee may be removed by a vote of that district committee concerned, unless his or her absence is caused by illness or temporary absence from the county on the date of the meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7468.

The removal of residence by an elected or appointed member of a district committee from the Assembly district or supervisorial district from which he or she has been elected or appointed a member of that committee shall constitute his or her automatic resignation from that committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7469.

A district committee shall remove any member of that committee who is required to be removed under Section 7413.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.

Whenever any person is appointed to fill a vacancy on a district committee, the district committee shall notify within 10 days the chairperson of the county central committee who shall file a notice of the appointment with the elections official within 30 days after it is made. The notices shall contain the name and address of the person appointed and the name of the person replaced, and shall indicate the date of the appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. AMERICAN INDEPENDENT PARTY [7500. - 7695.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7500. - 7500.]

7500.

This part shall apply to the organization, operation, and functions of that political party known as the American Independent Party of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. State Convention [7550. - 7580.]



  ARTICLE 1. Delegates [7550. - 7561.]

7550.

The state convention shall consist of one delegate for each of the following officers:

(a) Governor.

(b) Lieutenant Governor.

(c) Treasurer.

(d) Controller.

(e) Attorney General.

(f) Secretary of State.

(g) All members of the State Board of Equalization.

(h) All Senators and Representatives of Congress from California.

(i) All Members of the Legislature.

(j) National committeemen and committeewomen.

(k) Chairperson and state vice chairperson of the state central committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7551.

The state convention shall be composed of the following delegates:

(a) Each officer named in Section 7550 who was nominated and elected as a candidate of the party and whose term of office extends beyond the first Monday in December in the case of legislators and the Monday after January 1 in the case of other officers next following the direct primary election, or the appointee or successor appointed, elected, or otherwise designated by law to fill a vacancy in the office of any such officer.
 These delegates are “holdover delegates.”

(b) Each candidate of the party in whose behalf nomination papers were filed and who was nominated at the direct primary election by that party. These delegates are “nominee delegates.” Nominees for an office the term of which extends beyond two years are delegates to each succeeding state convention until that following the direct primary election at which nominations for the office are again to be made. If a candidate is a “nominee delegate” to the state convention held in the year in which he or she is nominated, and is elected to the office at the succeeding general election, he or she shall be considered a “holdover delegate” to the state convention of his or her party in the next odd-numbered year, if his or her party is required to hold the convention.

(c) One delegate appointed for each of the officers named in Section 7550 not
 represented by a “holdover delegate” nor by a “nominee delegate” of the party. These delegates shall be chosen and appointed in the manner provided in this chapter for filing vacancies in the state convention and shall be known as “appointive delegates.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7555.

Membership in the state convention shall not be granted to any party nominee unless he or she is registered as being a member of this party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7556.

A vacancy exists in the membership under any of the following circumstances:

(a) When there is no “holdover delegate” nor “nominee delegate” of the party.

(b) When any nominee is disqualified for membership under the provisions of Section 7555 or for any other reason stated in this division.

(c) When no nomination for an elective office has been made.

(d) When a delegate dies prior to the convention.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7557.

Delegates shall be appointed to fill vacancies in the membership as follows:

(a) If the vacancy occurs in a senatorial or Assembly district situated wholly within the limits of a single county, by appointment by the county central committee of the party in the county. Whenever a vacancy occurs by reason of the failure to nominate a person affiliated with the party, no person shall be chosen to fill the vacancy who does not reside in the senatorial or Assembly district involved.

(b) If the vacancy occurs in a senatorial or Assembly district comprising two or more counties, parts of two or more counties, or one or more counties and parts of one or more counties, by appointment by the county central committee representing more voters affiliated with the American Independent Party than does any other county central committee in the district.

(c) If there is no county central committee qualified to act, or the qualified county central committee fails to act, under the provisions of subdivision (a) or (b) of this section, the appointment shall be made by the state central committee of the party.

(d) If the vacancy occurs as to a delegate for a United States Senator from California or as to a delegate for any of the state officers named in Section 7550 by appointment by the state central committee of
 the party.

(e) If the vacancy occurs as to a delegate for any Representative in Congress from California, by appointment by the state central committee of the party of a voter who resides within the congressional district to be represented.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7559.

A county central committee may authorize its chairperson to appoint delegates to fill vacancies in the membership of party state conventions that the county central committee has power to fill.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7561.

If a person is a delegate to the state convention and qualified independently of that fact to be a delegate to the same state convention, he or she shall be a delegate by reason of the most recent election at which he or she becomes a delegate. The resulting vacancy shall be filled pursuant to Section 7557.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Meetings [7570. - 7570.]

7570.

The state convention shall meet biennially, at a location designated by the state central committee, at 10 a.m. on a Saturday following the direct primary election, but in no event later than August 15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Business [7575. - 7580.]

7575.

The convention shall be called to order by the chairperson of the state central committee at 10 a.m. of the day designated for the convention. It shall at once proceed to the election of a chairperson. The election shall be by alphabetical rollcall, if requested by a petition signed by 50 members. The convention shall elect other officers as the convention may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 724, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7576.

The chairperson shall appoint a committee consisting of one delegate from each senatorial district, which shall serve as the committee on credentials of the convention, and he or she shall appoint other committees as the convention may direct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7577.

The convention, upon election of permanent officers, shall adopt a state platform for this party. This platform shall be made public upon its adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7578.

In each year of the general election at which electors of President and Vice President of the United States are to be chosen, the convention shall also nominate as the candidates of its party as many electors of President and Vice President of the United States as the state is then entitled to, and one alternate elector for each of those electors, for the purposes of Chapter 1.2 (commencing with Section 6911) of Part 2 of Division 6. The convention shall certify the name of each elector and alternate elector nominated, and each elector’s residence address to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 11.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7579.

The vote on any issue at the convention, including the election of officers, may be by rollcall or any other method as may be prescribed by the convention.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.

The proceedings at the convention shall be governed by any manual of parliamentary procedure designated by the convention.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Central Committee [7600. - 7645.]



  ARTICLE 1. Members [7600. - 7614.]

7600.

The state central committee shall consist of all of the following persons:

(a) All delegates to the state convention.

(b) The chairperson of each county central committee of the party.

(c) Members appointed pursuant to this part.

(d) Any person nominated to fill a vacancy in a partisan office in a special
 election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7603.

Each delegate to the state convention shall appoint to membership on this committee one voter of the same sex as the delegate and two voters of the opposite sex. These appointments when so made shall be absolute.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7604.

A delegate to the state convention who at the date of that state convention is the incumbent of any of the offices listed in Section 7550 may appoint, without regard to sex, two additional voters to membership on this committee of this party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7605.

Any person who is a member of this committee by virtue of having been nominated to fill a vacancy in a partisan office in a special election, shall within 60 days of the special election, appoint members to this committee in the same manner as delegates to the state convention make those appointments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7608.

Each delegate to the state convention shall send a notice by mail to each person whom he or she has appointed as a member of this committee, that will inform him or her that:

(a) He or she is a member of the committee.

(b) The committee will meet in Sacramento and the date of the meeting.

(c) The meeting may be attended either in person or by proxy.

(d) The proxy shall be in writing, and signed by the member under penalty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7609.

A person is not eligible for appointment to this committee if he or she is not registered as affiliated with this party at the time of his or her appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7610.

This committee may remove any member who, during his or her term of membership, affiliates with or registers as a member of another party. This committee may also remove any appointed member who publicly advocates that the voters should not vote for the nominee of the party for any office, or who publicly gives support to or avows a preference for a candidate of another party who is opposed to a candidate nominated by this party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.

In the event of the appointment of an ineligible person, or whenever any member of this committee dies, resigns, or becomes incapacitated to act, or removes from the jurisdiction of the committee, or ceases to be a member of the committee’s party, a vacancy exists that shall be filled in the manner prescribed in Section 7612. A vacancy shall also exist on this committee when a member is removed from the committee pursuant to Section 7642, or Section 7610, and the vacancy shall be filled in the manner prescribed in Section 7612, the member to serve the
 remainder of the unexpired term of the member removed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.

Should a member appointed to membership pursuant to Section 7603 or 7604 cease to be a member for any of the reasons specified in Section 7611, the vacancy shall be filled by the person who appointed him or her, unless that person is himself or herself no longer a member of this committee or indicates that he or she does not wish to fill the vacancy, in which instances the committee shall do so.

Notice shall be given by the committee to a person entitled to fill a vacancy under this section as soon as possible after
 the occurrence of the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.

In the event the appointment of alternate or associate members is authorized by statute or the rules of the committee, this committee shall supply forms to the members for the appointment of those members. The forms shall be in substantially the same language as set forth in Section 7602, and shall contain suitable spaces wherein there can be listed the addresses and the numbers of the congressional, Assembly, and senatorial districts in which the appointees reside.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.

Each delegate to the state convention may appoint three voters as associate members of this committee. An associate member shall have those privileges and obligations as are given to him or her by the rules of the committee but shall not be able to vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Meetings [7620. - 7620.]

7620.

The committee shall convene in the same community where the state convention is held, at 10 a.m. on the Sunday following the state convention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Proxies [7628. - 7628.]

7628.

Revocation or change of proxies shall be recognized by this committee on proxies and credentials only upon a personal request made by the member before the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Business [7635. - 7645.]

7635.

The chairperson of this committee shall call the committee to order at 10 a.m. on the day of first meeting. The next business in order shall be the election of a temporary chairperson, which may be by acclamation, unless there is a contest, in which event the roll shall be called.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7636.

The temporary chairperson, upon election, shall immediately appoint a committee on proxies and credentials, consisting of one member from each senatorial district, selected from among the members of this committee certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.

This committee shall choose its officers by rollcall vote, poll of senatorial district delegations, or any other method as may be prescribed by the committee. Its officers shall have the power usually exercised by the officers of those committees insofar as may be consistent with this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7638.

This committee may select from its membership an executive committee, to which it may grant all or any portion of its powers and duties. If this committee grants any portion of its powers to an executive committee, it shall provide for the election to its executive committee of two members, one of each sex, from each senatorial district delegation. A senatorial district delegation shall consist only of those state central committee members who reside within that senatorial district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.

The state central committee or its executive committee shall designate by resolution or bylaw the national committee or party organization with which the American Independent Party is affiliated and shall file a copy of the resolution or bylaw with the Secretary of State. In the event of controversy over the national affiliation of the party, the most recent resolution or bylaw filed shall be determinative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7640.

The chairperson of this committee shall serve a two-year term, but shall not succeed himself or herself.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7641.

The elective officers provided for in the bylaws of this committee shall serve for two-year terms.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7642.

This committee may prescribe dues to be paid by those persons specified in Section 7600 in the manner and by the time prescribed by vote of the majority of the members of the committee. The dues charged shall not exceed twenty-four dollars ($24) per year.

Any member of this committee who fails to pay the dues prescribed by the committee may, upon first notifying the delegate to the state convention who appointed that member, be removed from the committee in the manner provided by the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7643.
